Louisiana, session 2026, SB440.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:1109.21 and 1109.22(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to
read as follows:
§1109.21. Renaissance district; creation; jurisdiction
A renaissance district is hereby created in any the parish of Rapides having
a population of more than one hundred twenty-nine thousand and less than one
hundred thirty-two thousand persons according to the most recent federal decennial
census, which shall be a political subdivision of the state.
§1109.22. Board of commissioners; appointment; terms
A. The renaissance district shall be governed by a commission which shall
control, administer, and manage its affairs. The commission shall be composed of
seven nine commissioners, and each shall be a qualified elector of and domiciled in
the parish. Each commissioner shall be appointed for a term of four years as follows:
(1) Five Four members shall be appointed by the parish of Rapides
governing authority as follows:
(a) Two One members member shall be appointed from an existing the
prior nonprofit entity renaissance board of directors as long as at least one
member of that board exists is capable of serving, after which time two one
members member shall be appointed from the residents of the parish who are not
employed by the parish police jury and who have experience with juveniles in
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 440 ENROLLED
education, rehabilitation, or incarceration of juveniles.
(b) Three members who are not employed by the parish police jury who have
experience with juveniles in education, rehabilitation, or incarceration of juveniles.
(2) One member who is employed by the sheriff's office of the parish of
Rapides having experience with juveniles in education, rehabilitation, or
incarceration of juveniles.
(3) One member who is employed by the office of the district attorney of the
parish of Rapides having experience with juveniles in education, rehabilitation, or
incarceration of juveniles.
(4) Three members appointed by the Central Louisiana Juvenile
Detention Center Authority having experience with juveniles in education,
rehabilitation, or incarceration of juveniles.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.